Utah statutes.
63M-7-301.   Definitions -- Creation of council -- Membership -- Terms.

(1) (a)  As used in this part, "council" means the Utah Substance Abuse Advisory Council created in this section.

(b)  There is created within the governor's office the Utah Substance Abuse Advisory Council.

(2)  The council shall be comprised of the following voting members:

(a)  the attorney general or the attorney general's designee;

(b)  a county commissioner designated by the Utah Association of Counties;

(c)  the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee;

(d)  the director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health or the director's designee;

(e)  the state superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(f)  the director of the Department of Health or the director's designee;

(g)  the executive director of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice or the executive director's designee;

(h)  the governor or the governor's designee;

(i)  the executive director of the Department of Corrections or the executive director's designee;

(j)  the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services or the director's designee;

(k)  the executive director of the private nonprofit Utah Domestic Violence Council or the executive director's designee;

(l)  the director of the Division of Indian Affairs or the director's designee;

(m)  the state court administrator or the state court administrator's designee;

(n)  the following members designated to serve four-year terms:

(i)  a member of the House of Representatives designated by the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(ii)  a member of the Senate designated by the president of the Senate; and

(iii)  a representative designated by the Utah League of Cities and Towns;

(o)  the following members appointed by the governor to serve four-year terms:

(i)  a representative of the Utah National Guard;

(ii)  one resident of the state who has been personally affected by alcohol or other drug abuse; and

(iii)  one citizen representative;

(p)  in addition to the voting members described in Subsections (2)(a) through (o), the following voting members may be appointed by a majority of the members described in Subsections (2)(a) through (o) to serve four-year terms:

(i)  a person knowledgeable in criminal justice issues;

(ii)  a person knowledgeable in substance abuse treatment issues;

(iii)  a person knowledgeable in substance abuse prevention issues; and

(iv)  a person knowledgeable in judiciary issues; and

(q)  in addition to the voting members described in Subsections (2)(a) through (p), one or more chairs or co-chairs of a committee established by the council under Subsection 63M-7-302(5) may be appointed as a voting member by a majority of the members described in Subsections (2)(a) through (p).

(3)  A person other than a person described in Subsection (2) may not be appointed as a voting member of the council.

